Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.085

Payrolls fund—Claims fund.

The legislative authority of any city or town is authorized to create the following special funds:

(1) Payrolls—into which moneys may be placed from time to time as directed by the legislative authority from any funds available and upon which warrants may be drawn and cashed for the purpose of paying any moneys due city employees for salaries and wages. The accounts of the city or town shall be so kept that they shall show the department or departments and amounts to which the payment is properly chargeable.

(2) Claims—into which may be paid moneys from time to time from any funds which are available and upon which warrants may be issued and paid in payment of claims against the city or town for any purpose. The accounts of the city or town shall be so kept that they shall show the department or departments and the respective amounts for which the warrant is issued and paid.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.085. Prior: 1953 c 27 s 1.]